Connecticut, session 2026, HB05138.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to eliminate the
additional one per cent sales and use taxes imposed on meals sold by
eating establishments, caterers or grocery stores that are located in
municipalities with a population of more than one hundred thousand.